Maine, session 132, LD576.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §1352-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 375, §11, is
further amended to read:
B. A person An applicant for licensure holding an active national council record whose
qualifications meet the requirements of this chapter upon application may be licensed
without further examination.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §1352-A, sub-§1, ¶B-1 is enacted to read:
B-1. An applicant for licensure who meets the requirements of a mutual recognition
agreement between this State and another state, territory or possession of the United
States, the District of Columbia or any foreign country, whose licensure qualifications
are, in the opinion of the board and by the language of the agreement, substantially
equivalent to the requirements of this chapter, may be licensed without further
examination.
Page 1 - 132LR0623(02)